New Jersey, session 222, A2269.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a school district shall receive an amount of Supplemental Stabilization Aid, in addition to the amount proposed in the State aid notice for the 2024-2025 school year distributed to school districts in March 2024, if: (1)  the districts State aid differential, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67), is positive in the 2024-2025 school year; (2)  the district is subject to a State school aid reduction pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.) in the 2024-2025 school year; and (3)  the amount of the districts proposed reduction in State school aid for the 2024-2025 school year is greater than one percent of the districts total operating budget in the 2023-2024 school year. The amount of Supplemental Stabilization Aid provided to a district shall be equal to the difference between the districts proposed reduction in State school aid for the 2024-2025 school year and one percent of the districts total operating budget in the 2023-2024 school year. To receive the Supplemental Stabilization Aid provided pursuant to this section, a school district shall submit to the Commissioner of Education, in a manner and form to be prescribed by the commissioner, a written plan explaining how the district will allocate these funds and how the district will fund operations in future school years in which the district does not receive Supplemental Stabilization Aid or similar supplemental State school aid. b.  In addition to the amounts proposed in the State aid notices for the 2024-2025 school year distributed to school districts in March 2024, there are appropriated such amounts as are required from the Property Tax Relief Fund to the Department of Education to effectuate the provisions of this act. c.  The amounts provided to each school district pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall be distributed as Supplemental Stabilization Aid, to ensure that no district receives a reduction in aid from the 2023-2024 school year that is greater than one percent of the districts total operating budget in the 2023-2024 school year. d.  Supplemental Stabilization Aid provided pursuant to this section shall not be allocated to a county vocational school district that, according to the amounts proposed in the State aid notices for the 2024-2025 school year distributed to school districts in March 2024, is proposed to receive vocational expansion stabilization aid pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-69). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and the aid provided pursuant to this act shall be distributed to school districts in the 2024-2025 school year.